dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ≔ mak yabiliyorumdur .
SFX ≔ mak yabiliyoruz .
SFX ≔ mak yabiliyoruzdur .
SFX ≔ mak yabiliş .
SFX ≔ mak yabiliş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilme .
SFX ≔ mak yabilme/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmeden .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmek .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmek/∙∨≌∢≊≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmeksizin .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmeyinceye .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmez .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmez/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmezken .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmiş .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmiş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmişlik .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmişlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilmişliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilse .
SFX ≔ mak yabilsek .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseler/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yabilselerdi .
SFX ≔ mak yabilsem .
SFX ≔ mak yabilsen .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseniz .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseydi .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseydik .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseydim .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseydin .
SFX ≔ mak yabilseydiniz .
SFX ≔ mak yabilsin .
SFX ≔ mak yabilsinler/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yalar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yalım .
SFX ≔ mak yama .
SFX ≔ mak yamadı .
SFX ≔ mak yamadık .
SFX ≔ mak yamadık/∧≋∡≉∺∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamadığ/X∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamadıkça .
SFX ≔ mak yamadılar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamadılarsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamadım .
SFX ≔ mak yamadın .
SFX ≔ mak yamadınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamadıysa .
SFX ≔ mak yamam .
SFX ≔ mak yamama .
SFX ≔ mak yamama/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamadan .
SFX ≔ mak yamamak .
SFX ≔ mak yamamak/∄∧≋∡≉∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamaksızın .
SFX ≔ mak yamamayıncaya .
SFX ≔ mak yamamaz .
SFX ≔ mak yamamaz/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamazken .
SFX ≔ mak yamamdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamamış .
SFX ≔ mak yamamış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışlardı .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışlarsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışlık .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışlık/∧≋∡≉∺∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışlığ/X∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsak .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsalar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsam .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsan .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsanız .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsın .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsındır .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışsınızdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamamıştır .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışım .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışımdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışız .
SFX ≔ mak yamamışızdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamasa .
SFX ≔ mak yamasak .
SFX ≔ mak yamasalar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamasalardı .
SFX ≔ mak yamasam .
SFX ≔ mak yamasan .
SFX ≔ mak yamasanız .
SFX ≔ mak yamasaydı .
SFX ≔ mak yamasaydık .
SFX ≔ mak yamasaydılar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamasaydım .
SFX ≔ mak yamasaydın .
SFX ≔ mak yamasaydınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamasın .
SFX ≔ mak yamasınlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabildi .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabildik .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabildik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabildiğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabildikçe .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilebilirlik .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilebilirlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilebilirliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilecakken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilecek .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilecek/∨≌∢≊∻≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabileceğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabileli .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilemeden .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilen .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilen/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilerek .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilerken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilesi .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilesi/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilici .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilici/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilince .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilinceye .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilip .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilir .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirdi .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirdik .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirdim .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirdin .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirdiniz .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirim .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirimdir .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliriz .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirizdir .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirler/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirlerdi .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirlik .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirmiş .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirse .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirsin .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirsindir .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirsiniz .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilirsinizdir .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyor .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyordu .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyorlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyormuş .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyorsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyorsun .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyorsunuz .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyorum .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliyoruz .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliş .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabiliş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilme .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilme/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmeden .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmek .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmek/∙∨≌∢≊≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmeksizin .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmeyinceye .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmez .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmez/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmezken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmiş .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmiş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmişlik .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmişlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilmişliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayabilse .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacak .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacak/∧≋∡≉∺∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacağ/X∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacakken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacaklar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacaklardır .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacaksındır .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacaksınızdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacaktı .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacağım .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacağımdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacağız .
SFX ≔ mak yamayacağızdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamayalı .
SFX ≔ mak yamayalım .
SFX ≔ mak yamayamadan .
SFX ≔ mak yamayan .
SFX ≔ mak yamayan/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayarak .
SFX ≔ mak yamayarken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayası .
SFX ≔ mak yamayası/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayayım .
SFX ≔ mak yamayıcı .
SFX ≔ mak yamayıcı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamayın .
SFX ≔ mak yamayınca .
SFX ≔ mak yamayıncaya .
SFX ≔ mak yamayınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamayıp .
SFX ≔ mak yamayırken .
SFX ≔ mak yamayız .
SFX ≔ mak yamayızdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamayış .
SFX ≔ mak yamayış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamaz .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdı .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdık .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdılar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdım .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdın .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamazdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamazken .
SFX ≔ mak yamazlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamazlardı .
SFX ≔ mak yamazlardır .
SFX ≔ mak yamazlarmış .
SFX ≔ mak yamazmış .
SFX ≔ mak yamazmışlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamazmışsın .
SFX ≔ mak yamazmışsınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamazmışım .
SFX ≔ mak yamazmışız .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsak .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsalar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsam .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsan .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsanız .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsın .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsındır .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsınız .
SFX ≔ mak yamazsınızdır .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyor .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyordu .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorduk .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyordum .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyordun .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyordunuz .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyordur .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorken .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorlardı .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorlardır .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorlarmış .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorlarsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyormuş .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyormuşlar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyormuşsun .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyormuşsunuz .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyormuşum .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyormuşuz .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsa .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsak .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsalar/∎ .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsam .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsan .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsanız .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsun .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsundur .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsunuz .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorsunuzdur .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorum .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyorumdur .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyoruz .
SFX ≔ mak yamıyoruzdur .
SFX ≔ mak yarakçasına .
SFX ≔ mak yasın .
SFX ≔ mak yasınız .
SFX ≔ mak yayım .
SFX ≔ mak ysalardı .
SFX ≔ mak ıcı [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ıcı/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ıl [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ıla [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildi [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildik [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildiğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildikçe [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildiler/∎ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildim [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildin [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabildiniz [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabilebilirlik [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabilebilirlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabilebilirliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabilecakken [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabilecek [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ≔ mak ılabilecek/∨≌∢≊∻≩ [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
