dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
abuklaşmak/≔⊂
acılaşmak/≔⊂
acıtmak/≔⊂
adlaşmak/≔⊂
aforozlanmak/≔⊂
akkorlaşmak/≔⊂
akortlanmak/≔⊂
aksırtmak/≔⊂
akıllanmak/≔⊂
akşamlatmak/≔⊂
alarmak/≔⊂
aldırtmak/≔⊂
allanmak/≔⊂
alçaklaşmak/≔⊂
alıklaştırmak/≔⊂
alıştırılmak/≔⊂
analaştırmak/≔⊂
anlamlandırılmak/≔⊂
anlaşmak/≔⊂
anıklaşmak/≔⊂
anıtlaşmak/≔⊂
aptallaşmak/≔⊂
aranmak/≔⊂
araçsallaştırmak/≔⊂
argolaştırmak/≔⊂
artakalmak/≔⊂
arzulanmak/≔⊂
arındırmak/≔⊂
asalaklaşmak/≔⊂
astırılmak/≔⊂
atlanmak/≔⊂
attırılmak/≔⊂
avcu kaşınmak/≔⊂
avuçlatmak/≔⊂
ayazlandırmak/≔⊂
aykırılaşmak/≔⊂
ayrılanmak/≔⊂
ayrımsızlaşmak/≔⊂
ayıklatmak/≔⊂
ayırmak/≔⊂
azarlanmak/≔⊂
azmanlaşmak/≔⊂
açkılatmak/≔⊂
açıklaşmak/≔⊂
ağalanmak/≔⊂
ağdalanmak/≔⊂
ağmak/≔≾
ağırlanmak/≔⊂
ağızlatmak/≔⊂
aşağısanmak/≔⊂
aşındırılmak/≔⊂
babalanmak/≔⊂
bakmak/≔≾
balkanlaşmak/≔⊂
balçıklaşmak/≔⊂
barbarlaşmak/≔⊂
barıştırmak/≔⊂
bastırmak/≔⊂
battallaşmak/≔⊂
bayağılaşmak/≔⊂
bayraklaştırılmak/≔⊂
bayındırlaştırmak/≔⊂
bağdaşıklaştırmak/≔⊂
bağnazlaşmak/≔⊂
bağımlılaştırmak/≔⊂
bağıtlaşmak/≔⊂
başarmak/≔⊂
başlanılmak/≔⊂
başına kalmak/≔⊂
beyazlatmak/≔⊂
billurlanmak/≔⊂
bohçalanmak/≔⊂
bollatmak/≔⊂
boncuklaşmak/≔⊂
boyatmak/≔⊂
boyutlandırmak/≔⊂
bozulaşmak/≔⊂
boşalmak/≔⊂
boşattırmak/≔⊂
budalalaşmak/≔⊂
bukağılanmak/≔⊂
bulaşmak/≔⊂
bunalmak/≔⊂
buruklaşmak/≔⊂
bıktırılmak/≔⊂
Cakmak/≔≾⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
caydırmak/≔⊂
ciyaklatmak/≔⊂
cıvıldanmak/≔⊂
daldırmak/≔⊂
damgalatmak/≔⊂
darlaştırmak/≔⊂
dayanılmak/≔⊂
delikanlılaşmak/≔⊂
devrileyazmak/≔⊂
dolaşılmak/≔⊂
dosyalanmak/≔⊂
duldalanmak/≔⊂
duyarsızlaşmak/≔⊂
düşmanlaştırmak/≔⊂
el atmak/≔⊂
farklılaşmak/≔⊂
fenalaşmak/≔⊂
foslatmak/≔⊂
fırınlanmak/≔⊂
gamlandırmak/≔⊂
gettolaştırılmak/≔⊂
gıcıklanmak/≔⊂
hamurlaştırmak/≔⊂
harılanmak/≔⊂
haydutlaşmak/≔⊂
helezonlaşmak/≔⊂
hortlatmak/≔⊂
huysuzlaşmak/≔⊂
hıyarlaşmak/≔⊂
ilahlaştırmak/≔⊂
inanılmak/≔⊂
itibarsızlaştırmak/≔⊂
kabuklaşmak/≔⊂
kaktırmak/≔⊂
kalkmak/≔≾
kalıplaşmak/≔⊂
kanatlanmak/≔⊂
kanıksanmak/≔⊂
kapsatmak/≔⊂
kararlaştırmak/≔⊂
kartlaşmak/≔⊂
kaskolatmak/≔⊂
katranlanmak/≔⊂
kavranmak/≔⊂
kaymaklanmak/≔⊂
kazandırmak/≔⊂
kaçırmak/≔⊂
kaşıttırmak/≔⊂
kocamanlaştırmak/≔⊂
kolalatmak/≔⊂
konuşlandırılmak/≔⊂
kotarılmak/≔⊂
krallaştırmak/≔⊂
kurallaşmak/≔⊂
kurumlaştırmak/≔⊂
kutuplaşmak/≔⊂
kıkırdaklaşmak/≔⊂
kınanmak/≔⊂
kırkmak/≔≾
kırılayazmak/≔⊂
kıskanılmak/≔⊂
kıvamlaştırmak/≔⊂
kıvırtmak/≔⊂
kızmak/≔≾
lüzumsuzlaşmak/≔⊂
manasızlaştırmak/≔⊂
mayalandırmak/≔⊂
meraklanmak/≔⊂
militanlaşmak/≔⊂
moruklaşmak/≔⊂
muzırlaşmak/≔⊂
nafakalandırmak/≔⊂
nişastalanmak/≔⊂
odaklaşmak/≔⊂
olgunlaşmak/≔⊂
onaylatmak/≔⊂
ortaklaşmak/≔⊂
oylatılmak/≔⊂
oğullanmak/≔⊂
palazlaşmak/≔⊂
parçalatmak/≔⊂
paylatmak/≔⊂
plazmalaştırmak/≔⊂
programlaşmak/≔⊂
pusatlanmak/≔⊂
pısırıklaştırmak/≔⊂
resim çıkarmak/≔⊂
rızıklanmak/≔⊂
sakarlaşmak/≔⊂
salaklaştırmak/≔⊂
sallatmak/≔⊂
sandırmak/≔⊂
sapmak/≔≾
sapıklaştırmak/≔⊂
sarmalanmak/≔⊂
sarılmak/≔⊂
savaştırılmak/≔⊂
sayfalandırmak/≔⊂
saçalanmak/≔⊂
sağlamlaştırmak/≔⊂
sendikalaştırmak/≔⊂
silahsızlandırılmak/≔⊂
softalaştırmak/≔⊂
somutlandırmak/≔⊂
sonuçlanmak/≔⊂
soylulaştırmak/≔⊂
soğuklaştırılmak/≔⊂
sucuklaşmak/≔⊂
suvarmak/≔⊂
sözü açılmak/≔⊂
sıcaklaştırmak/≔⊂
sıkılaşmak/≔⊂
sınıflandırtılmak/≔⊂
sınırlaştırılmak/≔⊂
sırnaştırmak/≔⊂
sıvıklaştırmak/≔⊂
sızlatmak/≔⊂
sığdırılmak/≔⊂
tabakalaşmak/≔⊂
takılmak/≔⊂
tanrılaşmak/≔⊂
tanıtılmak/≔⊂
tapşırmak/≔⊂
tasarlatmak/≔⊂
taçlandırmak/≔⊂
tekrarlanmak/≔⊂
tiye almak/≔⊂
tonlanmak/≔⊂
toplumsallaşmak/≔⊂
toz koparmak/≔⊂
tutuculaşmak/≔⊂
tıksırmak/≔⊂
tınmak/≔≾
tırnaklatmak/≔⊂
ulaşmak/≔⊂
umursanmak/≔⊂
ussallaştırmak/≔⊂
uyarlanmak/≔⊂
uylaştırılmak/≔⊂
uzatmak/≔⊂
uğraşmak/≔⊂
vasıflanmak/≔⊂
yadsınmak/≔⊂
yakınmak/≔⊂
yalpalatmak/≔⊂
yamanmak/≔⊂
yansızlaştırmak/≔⊂
yapıklanmak/≔⊂
yararlandırmak/≔⊂
yarılmak/≔⊂
yassılanmak/≔⊂
yavanlaşmak/≔⊂
yayvanlaşmak/≔⊂
yağlatmak/≔⊂
yobazlaşmak/≔⊂
yorumlatmak/≔⊂
yuhalatmak/≔⊂
yuvarlaklaştırmak/≔⊂
yıldızlaşmak/≔⊂
yığmak/≔≾
zorlaşmak/≔⊂
çabalatmak/≔⊂
çalarmak/≔⊂
çalışılmak/≔⊂
çarklatmak/≔⊂
çarşaflanmak/≔⊂
çatıştırılmak/≔⊂
çağrıştırmak/≔⊂
çoraklaşmak/≔⊂
çullandırmak/≔⊂
çıkılatmak/≔⊂
çırpılmak/≔⊂
çığırtmak/≔⊂
ılıtmak/≔⊂
ırmaklaşmak/≔⊂
ısırılmak/≔⊂
şahlandırmak/≔⊂
şartlandırılmak/≔⊂
şemalaştırmak/≔⊂
şıkırdatmak/≔⊂
